Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.747

Public corporations—Real property transferred by city, town, or county—Restrictions, notice, public meeting.

(1) In transferring real property to a public corporation, commission, or authority under RCW 35.21.730, the city, town, or county creating such public corporation, commission, or authority shall impose appropriate deed restrictions necessary to ensure the continued use of such property for the public purpose or purposes for which such property is transferred.

(2) The city, town, or county that creates a public corporation, commission, or authority under RCW 35.21.730 shall require of such public corporation, commission, or authority thirty days' advance written notice of any proposed sale or encumbrance of any real property transferred by such city, town, or county to such public corporation, commission, or authority pursuant to RCW 35.21.730(1). At a minimum, such notice shall be provided by such public corporation, commission, or authority to the chief executive or administrative officer of such city, town, or county, and to all members of its legislative body, and to each local newspaper of general circulation, and to each local radio or television station or other news medium which has on file with such corporation, commission, or authority a written request to be notified.

(3) Any property transferred by the city, town, or county that created such public corporation, commission, or authority may be sold or encumbered by such public corporation, commission, or authority only after approval of such sale or encumbrance by the governing body of the public corporation, commission, or authority at a public meeting of which notice was provided pursuant to RCW 42.30.080. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the governing body of the public corporation, commission, or authority from holding an executive session during a regular or special meeting in accordance with RCW 42.30.110(1)(c). In addition, the public corporation, commission, or authority shall advertise notice of the meeting in a local newspaper of general circulation at least twice no less than seven days and no more than two weeks before the public meeting.

[ 1990 c 189 s 1.]